Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-501
School board; property; maintenance; hiring of superintendent, teachers, and personnel.

The school board or board of education of a Class III or IV school district shall have the care and custody of the schoolhouse and other property of the district and shall have authority to hire a superintendent and the required number of teachers and other necessary personnel.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision V, § 9, p. 354;

R.S.1913, § 6789;

C.S.1922, § 6330;

C.S.1929, § 79-509;

R.S.1943, § 79-509;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 80, p. 719;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-441;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 254;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 31.
January 1, 2019
Members of school board act in a representative capacity and not as individuals. Greer v. Chelewski, 162 Neb. 450, 76 N.W.2d 438 (1956).

School board has no authority to build additions which are not repairs. School Dist. No. 35 of Sherman County v. Randolph, 57 Neb. 546, 77 N.W. 1073 (1899).